Utah statutes.
41-6a-1504.   Motorcycle or motor-driven cycle -- Footrests for passenger --
Height of handlebars limited.
(1)  A motorcycle or motor-driven vehicle carrying a passenger on a public
highway, other than in a sidecar or enclosed cab, shall be equipped with
footrests for the passenger.
(2)  A person may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle with
handlebars above shoulder height.
